North Dakota, session 69, SB2376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 54-58-03 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
5. The compact may not authorize gaming to be conducted by an Indian tribe at any
off-reservation location not permitted under a tribal-state gaming compact in effect on
August 1, 1997, except that in the case of the tribal-state gaming compact between
the Turtle Mountain Band of Chippewa and the state, gaming may be conducted on
land within Rolette County held in trust for the Band by the United States government
which was in trust as of the effective date of the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act of 1988
[Pub. L. 100-497; 102 Stat. 2467; 25 U.S.C. 2701 et seq.] and on the following
described real property situated within Grand Forks County, North Dakota, if approved
by the secretary of the interior under the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act of 1988
[Pub . L. 100 - 497; 102 Stat. 2467; 25 U.S.C. 2701 et seq.] :
a. The south five and one - half acres of the east sixty-four acres of the northeas t
quarter, section thirty, township one hundred fifty - one, range fifty ;
b. The west ninety - six acres of the northeast quarter of section thirty, township
one hundred fifty - one, range fifty; and
c. The north fifty - eight and one - half acres of the east sixty-four acres of the
northeast quarter of section thirty, township one hundred fifty - one, range fifty ,
Page No. 1 25.1295.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
except the north seven hundred ten and seventy-seven one - hundredths feet o f
the east six hundred forty-three and one - half feet thereof and except that part o f
the northeast quarter of the northeast quarter of section thirty, township
one hundred fifty - one, range fifty west of the fifth principal meridian, described as
follows: beginning at the northeast corner of section thirty; thence south zero
degrees zero minutes zero seconds west, assumed bearing, along the east line
of section thirty a distance of eight hundred and sixty and seventy-seven
one - hundredths feet; thence south eighty-nine degrees thirty - six minutes zero
seconds west seven hundred and three and one - half feet; thence north zero
degrees zero minutes zero seconds east eight hundred and sixty and seventy-
seven one - hundredths feet to the north line of section thirty; thence north
eighty - nine degrees thirty-six minutes zero seconds east, along the north line o f
said section thirty, a distance of seven hundred and three and one - half feet to the
point of beginning.
Page No. 2 25.1295.03000